District of Columbia statutes.
31-4312

Commissioner authorized to issue subpoenas; enforcement.

(a)

In the examination of any company as provided for in this subdivision, the Commissioner shall have power to issue subpoenas in the name of the Chief Judge of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to compel witnesses to appear and testify and/or to produce all books, records, papers, or documents before said Commissioner.

(b)

If any witness having been personally summoned shall neglect or refuse to obey the subpoena issued as herein provided, then and in that event the Commissioner may report that fact to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, or one of the judges thereof, and said Court, or any judge thereof, hereby is empowered to compel obedience to said subpoena to the same extent as witnesses may be compelled to obey the subpoenas of that Court.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1133, ch. 672, ch. II, § 13
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(a), (b)
May 24, 1949, 62 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 572, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c)(37)(A)
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(i), 44 DCR 1730

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3503.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-412.
1973 Ed., § 35-412.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4301.